Mississippi, session 2026, SB2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-85, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-85.  Each school shall allow their teachers to attend any school-sponsored extracurricular event for free.  In addition thereto, each teacher may bring one (1) guest who shall be allowed to attend the event for free.  For purposes of this section, "extracurricular" shall mean a voluntary activity sponsored by the school or an organization sanctioned by the school. Extracurricular events shall include, but not be limited to, athletic games, demonstrations, displays, competitions, public performances, marching band contests, school plays and club activities. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.